Hawaii statutes.
G.
Expenditures

§11-381 Campaign funds only used for
certain purposes. (a) Campaign funds may be used by a candidate,
treasurer, or candidate committee:

(1) For any purpose directly related:

(A) In the case of the candidate, to the
candidate's own campaign; or

(B) In the case of a candidate committee or
treasurer of a candidate committee, to the campaign of the candidate, question,
or issue with which they are directly associated;

(2) To purchase or lease consumer goods, vehicles,
equipment, and services that provide a mixed benefit to the candidate. The
candidate, however, shall reimburse the candidate's candidate committee for the
candidate's personal use of these items unless the personal use is de minimis;

(3) To make donations to any community service,
educational, youth, recreational, charitable, scientific, or literary
organization; provided that in any election period, the total amount of all
donations shall be no more than twice the maximum amount that one person may
contribute to that candidate pursuant to section 11-357; provided further that
no contributions shall be made from the date the candidate files nomination
papers to the date of the general election;

(4) To make donations to any public school or public
library; provided that in any election period, the total amount of all
contributions shall be no more than twice the maximum amount that one person
may contribute to that candidate pursuant to section 11-357; provided further
that any donation under this paragraph shall not be aggregated with or imputed
toward any limitation on donations pursuant to paragraph (3);

(5) To award scholarships to full-time students
attending an institution of higher education or a vocational education school
in a program leading to a degree, certificate, or other recognized educational
credential; provided that in any election period, the total amount of all
scholarships awarded shall be no more than twice the maximum amount that one
person may contribute to that candidate pursuant to section 11-357; provided
further that no awards shall be made from the filing deadline for nomination
papers to the date of the general election;

(6) To purchase not more than two tickets for each
event held by another candidate or committee, whether or not the event constitutes
a fundraiser as defined in section 11-342;

(7) To make contributions to the candidate's party so
long as the contributions are not earmarked for another candidate; or

(8) To pay for ordinary and necessary expenses
incurred in connection with the candidate's duties as a holder of an office,
including expenses incurred for memberships in civic or community groups.

(b) Campaign funds may be used for the
candidate's next subsequent election upon registration for the election
pursuant to section 11-321. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2; am L 2012, c 20, §2; am L
2016, c 247, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next